Arkansas, session 2025, SB610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-4-1304(e)(2)(E), as enacted by Acts
2025, No. 373, § 16, concerning the time allowed for review of an annual
update filing by the Arkansas Public Service Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(E) The commission shall complete its review of each
annual update filing and issue its order within sixty (60) days ninety (90)
days following the date of the annual update filing.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-4-1306(e)(1), as enacted by Acts 2025,
No. 373, § 16, concerning an order approving a rider rate schedule under the
Generating Arkansas Jobs Act of 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Upon receipt of an electric distribution cooperative's or an
electric generation and transmission cooperative's filing to implement the
rider rate schedule and each annual update under this subchapter, the
commission shall issue an order approving the rider rate schedule and each
annual update to recover strategic investments under this subchapter if the
*ANS481*
04-07-2025 15:49:46 ANS481

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB610
commission determines that the electric distribution cooperative's or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative's application complies with
and therefore is in the public interest the provisions of this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-4-1306(e)(2)(E), as enacted by Acts
2025, No. 373, § 16, concerning the time allowed for review of an annual
update filing by the Arkansas Public Service Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(E) The commission shall complete its review of each
annual update filing and issue its order within sixty (60) days ninety (90)
days following the date of the annual update filing.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the General Assembly passed
Acts 2025, No. 373, to allow for significant investment in electric public
utility infrastructure and natural gas public utility infrastructure to
enable this state to attract and serve economic development projects across a
variety of industries, as well as to continue reliably supporting existing
and new customers; that an engrossing error was discovered during the review
of Acts 2025, No. 373; and that this act is immediately necessary to correct
the engrossing error found during the review of Acts 2025, No. 373.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/J. Dismang




04-07-2025 15:49:46 ANS481